Tennessee, session 114, SB1562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (68).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee state veterans' homes board, created by § 58-7-102;
SECTION 3. The Tennessee state veterans' homes board shall report back to the
education, health, and general welfare joint evaluation committee by December 31, 2026, to
update the committee on its progress in addressing the findings and observations set forth in
the December 2025 performance audit report issued by the division of state audit.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1562
010120
- 1 -